Hawaii statutes.
[§414-147] Action by single and multiple
voting groups. (a) If the articles of incorporation or this chapter
provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter
is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in section 414-146.

(b) If the articles of incorporation or this
chapter provide for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on
that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups
counted separately as provided in section 414‑146. Action may be taken
by one voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another
voting group entitled to vote on the matter. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next